Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6909.01
Health maintenance organization, defined.

Health maintenance organization means a person that undertakes to provide or arrange for the delivery of basic health care services to enrollees on a prepaid basis, except for enrollee responsibility for copayments or deductibles or both.

Laws 2002, LB 1139, § 45.